Washington statutes.
RCW 43.82.045

Approval of leases—Privately owned buildings being planned or under construction.

State agencies are prohibited from entering into lease agreements for privately owned buildings that are in the planning stage of development or under construction unless there is prior written approval by the director of the office of financial management. Approval of such leases shall not be delegated. Lease agreements described in this section must comply with RCW 43.82.035.

[ 2007 c 506 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2007 c 506: See note following RCW 43.82.035.